Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles
31-3-75.
Senator Emeritus — William Zuccarelli.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former senator William Zuccarelli. This plate is to bear the identification “Senator Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as William Zuccarelli so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 401, § 1.

31-3-76.
Special license plate decal.

Notwithstanding any general law or regulation to the contrary, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles is hereby directed to make available a special license plate decal of the American flag made of the same material as the year sticker.

Upon the registration or renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the division of motor vehicles shall provide the owner the option to purchase for five dollars ($5.00), the American flag decal. Such decal shall be affixed at the lower left corner of the rear license plate and shall not obscure the reading of any part of the license plate.

After payment for the cost of production of the American flag decals, the next fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) generated from sales, shall be used to advertise and promote the purchase of these decals. All funds generated which exceed the production and promotion costs shall be contributed to the Rhode Island Military Family Relief Fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 260, § 1.

31-3-77.
Adjutant General Emeritus — Reginald A. Centracchio.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of the former Adjutant General of the Rhode Island National Guard, Reginald A. Centracchio.

This plate is to bear the identification “Adjutant General Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Reginald A. Centracchio so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 312, § 1.

31-3-78.
Special plate for Rotary International.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to the owners of private passenger motor vehicles who are members of Rotary Club International, District 7950, State of Rhode Island, special motor vehicle registration plates.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

Rotary Club motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rotary Club in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles.

Rotary Club plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least three hundred and sixty (360) plates. Rotary Club plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Rotary Club plates shall be subject to a one-time fifty dollar ($50.00) issuance surcharge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 436, § 1.

31-3-79.
Special plate for Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates based upon two (2) not-for-profit entities, the Audubon Society of Rhode Island and Save the Bay. The plate shall be designed to reference both entities.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles.

Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates. Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually and equally; ten dollars ($10.00) per plate to the Audubon Society of Rhode Island; and ten dollars ($10.00) per plate to Save the Bay, to assist the Audubon Society of Rhode Island and Save the Bay in furtherance of their mission of preserving the state’s natural scenic beauty, fish and wildlife, and to continue the educational efforts of these respective entities. The distributions to the Audubon Society of Rhode Island and Save the Bay shall be placed in separate restricted accounts for each entity and shall be paid to the Audubon Society of Rhode Island and Save the Bay.

A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated equally; five dollars ($5.00) per registration to the Audubon Society of Rhode Island; and five dollars ($5.00) per registration to Save the Bay.

Both the Audubon Society of Rhode Island and Save the Bay will be required to submit an annual audit, prepared by a certified public accountant before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Audubon Society of Rhode Island/Save the Bay plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 353, § 1.

31-3-80.
Reserve Forces plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to make available to all active and retired members of the United States Reserve Forces of Rhode Island a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) or less.

The special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry on it the designation “US Reserve Forces” and shall carry on it the titles, (Army, Marines, Navy, Air Force and Coast Guard) arranged on the left hand side of the plate from top to bottom in this order of precedence, with numerals to the right of the titles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon payment of a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate. All revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.

For the purposes of this section an active or retired member of the United States Reserve Forces shall be defined as currently serving or having retired under honorable conditions from any of the Reserve Forces other than the Rhode Island Army or Air National Guard.

In a national state of emergency, any active member of the United States Reserve Forces driving a vehicle bearing the special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by any state or municipal authority.

No US Reserve Forces plates shall be issued until at least nine hundred (900) such plates have been ordered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 643, § 1.

31-3-81.
General state officers emeritus.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed upon request to issue a special registration plate in recognition of honorable service to the state of a former state general officer for the private passenger motor vehicle of said officer to bear the identification of “Governor Emeritus”, “Lieutenant Governor Emeritus”, “Treasurer Emeritus”, “Secretary of State Emeritus”, or “Attorney General Emeritus”, whichever applies, along with an appropriate number and the seal of the state imprinted on it. The plate shall be furnished without an additional registration charge for such period as the qualified former general officer so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 487, § 1.

31-3-82.
Special plate for WaterFire Providence.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit WaterFire Providence.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

WaterFire motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by WaterFire Providence in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles.

WaterFire plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates. WaterFire plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, WaterFire plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to WaterFire Providence to assist in the fiscal needs required to keep this event free for all to enjoy, and to continue in the fostering of WaterFire’s presence as an asset to Rhode Island’s economic growth and prosperity. The distribution to WaterFire Providence shall be placed in a restricted account and shall be paid to WaterFire Providence.

WaterFire Providence will be required to submit an annual audit prepared by a certified public accountant before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of WaterFire plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 468, § 1.

31-3-83.
Judge Emeritus — Vincent A. Ragosta.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former Superior Court Judge, Vincent A. Ragosta. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus” with an appropriate number and a seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be furnished without an additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge Ragosta so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 181, § 1.

31-3-84.
Special plate in honor of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate in honor of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. The plate shall bear the designation “Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. 1929-1968” and shall bear the seal of the state imprinted on it. The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the original registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

A special automobile or commercial commemorative Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. plate shall be issued upon application using forms furnished by the administrator upon payment in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, and a service charge of forty dollars ($40.00) for each issue. The service charge shall be paid to the administrator prior to the administrator’s acceptance of the application. The forty dollar ($40.00) service charge shall be allocated to the division of motor vehicles for its costs in manufacturing and distributing the special plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 247, § 1.

31-3-85.
Special plate for the New England Patriots Charitable Foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the not-for-profit entity, the New England Patriots Charitable Foundation, for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile, commercial vehicle having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less, or combination vehicle.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate. The administrator shall be authorized to retain newly issued plate numbers, at his or her discretion, for the purpose of conducting auctions of the right to use and display those numbers under such terms and conditions as the administrator may permit.

Auction proceeds shall be apportioned and distributed for charitable purposes, in the discretion of the administrator, in accordance with such agreements as may be entered into with those entities holding ownership rights to the logos. The administrator is hereby authorized to enter into agreements for the use of logos on Rhode Island registration plates.

The New England Patriots Charitable Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island State Police.

New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates with respect to each plate type authorized pursuant to this section. New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the New England Patriots Charitable Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for the production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. Subsequent New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plate orders will be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, prepayment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the New England Patriots Charitable Foundation in furtherance of its mission of assisting the youth and families of New England through donations that foster cultural diversity, education, family, and health.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the New England Patriots Charitable Foundation.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The New England Patriots Charitable Foundation will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of New England Patriots Charitable Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 21.

31-3-86.
Special plate for Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for profit Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. The plates shall be designed to reference Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc., and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures, and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. to assist in the fiscal needs required to maintain and protect this historic site for all to enjoy, and to continue in the fostering of the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse’s, Inc. presence as an asset to Rhode Island’s economic growth and prosperity. The distribution to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. shall be placed in a restricted account and shall be paid to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc.

An additional ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall apply to holders of the plate. All proceeds shall be distributed annually to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc., to assist in the fiscal needs required to maintain and protect the iconic Plum Beach Lighthouse. The distribution to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc., shall be placed in a restricted account and shall be paid to the Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc.

The Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Friends of Plum Beach Lighthouse, Inc. plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 446, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 227, § 1.

31-3-87.
Special plate for breast cancer support.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate for victims and survivors of breast cancer. The plate shall bear the designation “www.breastcancerRI.org”, and shall bear the pink ribbon associated with breast cancer support.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The “Breast Cancer Support” motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The “Breast Cancer Support” motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates. Rhode Island breast cancer coalition plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, “Breast Cancer Support” motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Rhode Island Breast Cancer Coalition.

A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Chapter Breast Cancer Coalition.

The Rhode Island Breast Cancer Coalition shall be required to submit an annual audit, prepared by a certified public accountant before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of “Breast Cancer Support” motor vehicle plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 226, § 1.

31-3-88.
Special plate in support of public education.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate in support of public education. The plate shall bear the designation “Support Public Education”, and shall bear a design chosen by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and which shall depict a ruler and an apple.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The “Support Public Education” motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The “Support Public Education” motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates. The Rhode Island “Support Public Education” plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, “Support Public Education” motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the division of motor vehicles for its costs in manufacturing and distributing the special plates and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually, based upon the vehicle registration, to the local school districts for educational purposes.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of “Support Public Education” motor vehicle plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 214, § 1.

31-3-89.
Rhode Island law enforcement memorial benefit fund license plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates honoring law enforcement officers that have been killed in the line of duty. The plate shall be designed to reference Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund plates.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The special motor vehicle plate shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles and with the final approval from the Rhode Island state police.

Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates. Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be deposited in the division of motor vehicles manufacturing account, and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund.

A five dollar ($5.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Law Enforcement Memorial Benefit Fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 52, § 1.

31-3-90.
Special plate for the Red Sox Foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the not-for-profit entity, the Red Sox Foundation for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or commercial vehicle having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate. The administrator shall be authorized to retain newly issued plate numbers, at his or her discretion, for the purpose of conducting auctions of the right to use and display those numbers under such terms and conditions as the administrator may permit.

Auction proceeds shall be apportioned and distributed for charitable purposes, in the discretion of the administrator, in accordance with such agreements as may be entered into with those entities holding ownership rights to the logos. The administrator is hereby authorized to enter into agreements for the use of logos on Rhode Island registration plates.

The Red Sox Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island State Police.

Red Sox Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates. Red Sox Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Red Sox Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for the production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. Subsequent Red Sox Foundation plate orders will be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Red Sox Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Red Sox Foundation in furtherance of their mission of assisting the youth and families of New England through donations that foster cultural diversity, education, family and health.

A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Red Sox Foundation.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Red Sox Foundation, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island based charitable organizations.

The Red Sox Foundation will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Red Sox Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 27, § 1.

31-3-91.
Special plate for the Bristol Fourth of July Committee.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate for the Bristol Fourth of July Committee.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Bristol Fourth of July Committee motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Bristol Fourth of July Committee in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Bristol Fourth of July Committee plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) plates. The Bristol Fourth of July Committee plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order shall be handled by the Bristol Fourth of July Committee and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for the production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. Subsequent Bristol Fourth of July Committee plate orders shall be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Bristol Fourth of July Committee plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20) shall be distributed annually to the Bristol Fourth of July Committee to assist in the fiscal needs required to conduct Bristol’s historic Fourth of July celebration. (The distribution to the Bristol Fourth of July Committee shall be placed in a restricted receipt account and shall be paid to the Bristol Fourth of July Committee.)

The Bristol Fourth of July Committee will be required to submit an annual financial statement before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Bristol Fourth of July Committee plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 203, § 1.

31-3-92.
Judge Emeritus — Raymond E. Shawcross.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former Family Court Judge Raymond E. Shawcross. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus” with an appropriate number and seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be issued subject to the same terms and conditions as contained in §

31-3-47(d)

for such period of time as Judge Shawcross so desires. The provisions of §

31-3-17.1

shall apply with respect to the cost of issuance and registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 410, § 1.

31-3-93.
Special plate for the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special design motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the not-for-profit entity the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation. The plates shall be designed to reference the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation.

The special design plates shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special design plates.

The Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles and with final approval from the Rhode Island state police.

The Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of passenger plates. The Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fees, The Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be deposited in the division of motor vehicles manufacturing account and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation in furtherance of their mission to raise breast cancer awareness, increase breast health education and generate funding for critical breast health programs that are in desperate need of being brought to fruition.

The Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation will be required to submit an annual audit, prepared by a certified public accountant before such monies are distributed.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Gloria Gemma breast cancer resource foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 400, § 1.

31-3-94.
Expiration of authorization of issuance of special motor vehicle plates.

The statutory authorization of the issuance of any special motor vehicle registration plates after January 1, 2022, shall expire if any statutorily mandated minimum number of prepaid orders of such plates has not been satisfied within five (5) years following the enactment of such authorization.

The statutory authorization of the issuance of any special motor vehicle registration plates enacted prior to January 1, 2022, shall expire on June 30, 2023, if any statutorily mandated minimum number of prepaid orders of such plates has not been satisfied prior to that date.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 2, 2022.